Washington statutes.
RCW 38.16.020

Discharge of enlisted persons.

An enlisted person discharged from service in the organized militia of Washington shall receive a notice of discharge in writing in such form and classification as is or shall be prescribed by law or regulations, and in time of peace discharges may be given prior to the expiration of terms of enlistment under such regulations as may be prescribed by competent authority.

[ 1989 c 19 s 31; 1943 c 130 s 36; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-36. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 31; 1909 c 134 s 45, part; 1895 c 108 s 67, part.]